District of Columbia statutes.
2-826

Installation of communication facilities.

The Mayor, the Secretary of the Interior, and the Inaugural Committee are authorized to permit telegraph, telephone, radio-broadcasting, and television companies to extend overhead wires to such points along the line of any parade as shall be deemed convenient for use in connection with such parade and other inaugural purposes. Such wires shall be removed within 10 days after the conclusion of the inaugural period.

Aug. 6, 1956, 70 Stat. 1050, ch. 974, § 7
1981 Ed., § 1-1806.
1973 Ed., § 1-1207.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.